Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1365
Complaints; department; duties; confidentiality; immunity.

(1) Any person may submit a complaint to the department and request investigation of an alleged violation of the Cremation of Human Remains Act or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act. The department shall review all complaints and determine whether to conduct an investigation relating to such complaints.

(2) A complaint submitted to the department under this section shall be confidential. A person submitting such complaint shall be immune from criminal or civil liability of any nature, whether direct or derivative, for submitting the complaint or for disclosure of documents, records, or other information to the department relating to such complaint.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 11.